phon-mredup.xfst
! m-reduplication kitap -> mitap
!
!
define consonant  @"consonant.a";
define vowel  @"vowel.a";
define upper  @"uppercase.a";
define lower  @"lowercase.a";
define upperV upper & vowel;
define upperC upper & consonant;
define lowerV lower & vowel;
define lowerC lower & consonant;

regex [..] -> m || ⟪mredup⟫ _ lowerV
    ,,[..] -> M || ⟪mredup⟫ _ upperV
    ,, lowerC -> m || ⟪mredup⟫ _ 
    ,, upperC -> M || ⟪mredup⟫ _ 
    ,,  A -> a, B -> b, C -> c, Ç -> ç, D -> d,
        E -> e, F -> f, G -> g, Ğ -> ğ, H -> h,
        I -> i, İ -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l,
        M -> m, N -> n, O -> o, Ö -> ö, P -> p,
        R -> r, S -> s, Ş -> ş, T -> t, U -> u,
        Ü -> ü, V -> v, Y -> y, Z -> z, Î -> î,
        Û -> û, Â -> â || ⟪mredup⟫ _
    ,, ⟪mredup⟫ -> 0
;
! regex ⟪mredup⟫ -> 0 ;
